Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 5

Tennessee Runaway Act

37-2-501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Runaway Act.”

Acts 1976, ch. 683, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-1601.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.

Cross-References. Family violence shelters and child abuse prevention services, title 71, ch. 6, part 2.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VII. Protection of Minors (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 489 (1978).

37-2-502. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of children's services;

“Runaway” means any person under eighteen (18) years of age who is away from the home or residence of such person's parents or guardians without such parents' or guardians' consent. “Runaway” does not include persons under eighteen (18) years of age who lawfully reside with a close relative or those attending educational institutions, or those placed by court order, on a contractual agreement with a parent or guardian;

“Runaway house” means any house or institution giving sanctuary or housing to any person under eighteen (18) years of age, who is away from the home or residence of such person's parents or guardians without such parents' or guardians' consent; and

“Sanctuary” means a house, institution or other organization providing housing or accommodations to runaways as set forth in this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 683, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-1602; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 73.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VII. Protection of Minors (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 489 (1978).

37-2-503. Registration requirement for runaway houses.

All houses, institutions or other organizations giving sanctuary to runaway youths shall be registered with the department. No such house or institution shall provide sanctuary to such persons unless it is registered in accordance with this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 683, § 3; T.C.A., § 37-1603.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VII. Protection of Minors (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 489 (1978).

37-2-504. Minimum standards for runaway houses — Establishment.

The department shall establish minimum standards for runaway houses and shall not issue registration to any runaway house that does not comply with this part or does not meet or exceed the minimum standards established by the department. This part applies to all runaway houses without regard to their title or designation or additional services rendered.

Acts 1976, ch. 683, § 4; T.C.A., § 37-1604.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.

37-2-505. Minimum standards — Contents.

The standards established by the department shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Separate quarters for males and females;

Supervision of both sexes;

Complete and accurate records of all runaways housed;

Minimum health and safety requirements as established by the department;

A program for prevention or treatment for the use of drugs and permitting use of medication by runaways only upon the advice of a physician;

An examination for communicable diseases; and

Structured programs for all residents of the facility.

Acts 1976, ch. 683, § 5; T.C.A., § 37-1605.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.

37-2-506. Shelter for runaways.

Any runaway seeking sanctuary may be given shelter for seventy-two (72) hours; provided, that:

The runaway is not known to have committed, nor is under investigation for the commission of, a delinquent or criminal act;

A good faith attempt is made to notify the juvenile court with jurisdiction in the county in which the runaway house is located, or the runaway's parent or guardian, of the runaway's location within one (1) hour of the runaway's arrival; and

No runaway admitted to a runaway house shall be removed during the seventy-two (72) hours of sanctuary other than by order of the juvenile court in the jurisdiction.

Any juvenile judge in this or another state may release a runaway from a runaway house in another jurisdiction by contacting the juvenile judge having jurisdiction over the receiving runaway house.

Acts 1976, ch. 683, § 6; T.C.A., § 37-1606.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VII. Protection of Minors (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 489 (1978).

37-2-507. Violations — Penalties.

The owner, operator or agent of any house or facility that operates without registering or otherwise willfully violates this part commits a Class C misdemeanor. If, in the discretion of the trial court, a second or subsequent offense indicates continued or regular noncompliance with this part, the facility may be enjoined from future operations as a runaway house.

Acts 1976, ch. 683, § 7; T.C.A., § 37-1607; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 purported to enact a new title 37, chapter 2, part 5; however, since the Tennessee Code already contains a title 37, chapter 2, part 5, the code commission added Acts 2009, ch. 415, § 1 as title 37, chapter 2, part 6.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VII. Protection of Minors (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 489 (1978).